Wyoming, session 2025, HB0041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-11-418 and 35-11-504(e) are
amended to read:
35-11-418. Cash or securities in lieu of bond.
(a) For coal mining operations, in lieu of a bond,
the operator or its principal may deposit federally insured
certificates of deposit payable to the Wyoming department
of environmental quality, or cash, or government
securities, or irrevocable letters of credit issued by a
bank organized to do business in the United States, or all
four (4).
(b) For noncoal mining operations that take place on
land that is not owned or operated by the United States or
a federal agency, in lieu of a bond, the operator or the
operator's principal may deposit federally insured
certificates of deposit payable to the Wyoming department
of environmental quality, or cash, or government
securities, or irrevocable letters of credit issued by a
bank or credit union organized to do business in the United
States, or all four (4).
(c) Irrevocable letters of credit deposited under
this section shall be issued by a bank that is insured by
the federal deposit insurance corporation or a credit union
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
that is insured by the national credit union
administration.
35-11-504. Bonding for solid waste management
facilities.
(e) In lieu of a bond, the operator may deposit
federally insured certificates of deposit payable to the
Wyoming department of environmental quality, cash,
government securities, or irrevocable letters of credit
issued by a bank or a credit union organized to do business
in the United States, or all four (4). Irrevocable letters
of credit deposited under this subsection shall be issued
by a bank that is insured by the federal deposit insurance
corporation or a credit union that is insured by the
national credit union administration.
Section 2. This act shall apply to irrevocable
letters of credit deposited under W.S. 35-11-418 and
35-11-504(e) that are issued on and after the effective
date of this act.
Section 3. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation by the department of environmental quality,
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3